Hawaii, session 2026, HB1913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that veterans residing at the Daniel K. Akaka state veterans home have a higher prevalence of diagnoses for post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, anxiety, and other military service-related mental health conditions. Effective long-term care for these veterans requires comprehensive and coordinated mental health support that is integrated into daily operations and aligned with federal and state resources. The legislature further finds that establishing an on-site mental health coordinator position at the Daniel K. Akaka state veterans home will improve continuity of care, provide support for other staff, and ensure that veterans receive timely access to appropriate services without duplicating existing clinical systems. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish an on‑site mental health coordinator position at the Daniel K. Akaka state veterans home. SECTION 2.  (a)  There is established within the office of veterans' services one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) mental health coordinator position at the Daniel K. Akaka state veterans home on the island of Oahu.  The mental health coordinator shall be appointed by the director of the office of veterans' services without regard to chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and shall serve at the pleasure of the director. (b) The mental health coordinator shall be responsible for coordinating mental and behavioral health services for residents of the Daniel K. Akaka state veterans home, including: (1)  Facilitating mental health screenings and referrals for residents upon admission; (2)  Coordinating care with: (A)  The United States Department of Veterans Affairs; (B)  State behavioral health programs; and (C)  Contracted providers; (3)  Supporting continuity of mental health care during transitions of care; (4)  Assisting other veterans home staff in developing trauma-informed care practices and crisis response protocols; and (5)  Serving as the primary point of contact for residents and their families for concerns related to mental health services. (c)  The mental health coordinator may be a licensed mental health professional, or a qualified health care administrator having experience in behavioral health coordination. (d)  Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require the Daniel K. Akaka state veterans home to provide direct mental health treatment beyond its existing scope of services. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of a mental health coordinator position at the Daniel K. Akaka state veterans home. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of veterans' services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________